Utah statutes.
58-46a-302.5.   Supervision requirements -- Hearing instrument interns.

(1)  A hearing instrument intern shall complete 4,000 supervised hours of practice as a hearing instrument specialist intern.

(2)  The 4,000 hours required in Subsection (1) shall be under the direct supervision of a licensed hearing instrument specialist, until the intern:

(a)  receives a passing score on a practical examination demonstrating acceptable skills in the area of hearing testing as approved by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(b)  completes the National Institute for Hearing instrument studies education and examination program, or an equivalent college level program as approved by the division in collaboration with the board.

(3)  Upon satisfaction of the direct supervision requirement of Subsection (2) the intern shall:

(a)  complete the balance of the 4,000 supervised hours under indirect supervision; and

(b)  receive a passing score on the International Licensing Examination of the hearing instrument dispenser or other tests approved by the division.

